Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6874HV (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2703 Section 1. Section 232.68, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. âInterviewâ means the verbal exchange between the child 3 protection worker or peace officer and the child for the 4 purpose of developing information necessary to protect the 5 child and may include an interview of the child authorized by 6 the child protection worker or peace officer at an accredited 7 child protection center or child advocacy center established 8 pursuant to section 135.118 . A child protection worker or 9 peace officer is not precluded from recording visible evidence 10 of abuse. 11 Sec. 2. Section 232.71B, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 12 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 b. If a report is determined not to constitute a child 14 abuse allegation or if the child abuse report is accepted 15 but assessed under the family assessment, but a criminal act 16 harming a child is alleged, the department shall immediately 17 refer the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency. 18 With the consent of the childâs parent or guardian, a peace 19 officer may visit the home of the child for an interview or 20 observation. If permission to enter the home, to interview 21 the child, or to observe the child is refused, the court or a 22 district court, upon a showing of probable cause, may authorize 23 the interview or observation of the child. 24 Sec. 3. Section 232.71B, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 6. Home visit and child interview . The assessment may, 27 with the consent of the parent or guardian, include a visit to 28 the home of the child named in the report and . The assessment 29 may include an interview or observation of the child may be 30 conducted . If permission to enter the home , to interview 31 the child, or to observe the child is refused, the juvenile 32 court or district court upon a showing of probable cause may 33 authorize the person making the assessment to enter the home 34 and may authorize the person making the assessment to complete 35 -1- LSB 6874HV (1) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 2703 a child interview or observe the child. 1